Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.785

Publication of transferable college-level courses—Course lists for one-year academic completion certificates and transferable degrees.

(1)(a) Community and technical colleges must identify and publish in their admissions materials the college-level courses that are recognized by all four-year institutions of higher education as transferable to the four-year institutions of higher education. Publication of the list of courses must be easily identified and accessible on the college's website.

(b) If a four-year institution of higher education does not require courses of majors for transfer, the community and technical colleges must identify and publish the transfer policy of the institution in their admissions materials and make the transfer policy of the institution easily identifiable on the college's website.

(2) Community and technical colleges must create a list of courses that satisfy the basic requirements, distribution requirements, and approved electives for:

(a) A one-year academic completion certificate as provided for under RCW 28B.10.696; and

(b) A transferable associate of arts or sciences degree as provided for under RCW 28B.10.696.

(3) To the extent possible, each community and technical college must develop links between the lists in subsections (1) and (2) of this section and its list of courses, and develop methods to encourage students to check the lists in subsections (1) and (2) of this section when the students are registering for courses.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 10 s 12.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2011 1st sp.s. c 10: See notes following RCW 28B.15.031.